Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 4. Rates and Rate Schedules.

Sec. 42.06.350.
Tariffs, contracts, filing, and public inspection.

Under regulations adopted by the commission, every intrastate oil or gas pipeline carrier shall file with the commission, within the time and in the form designated by the commission, all rates, tariffs, charges, classifications, rules, regulations, terms, and conditions pertaining to service provided under the certificate, and shall maintain copies on file at its principal business office and at places designated by the commission, available to, and subject to inspection by, the general public on demand.

The commission may reject the filing of all or part of a tariff that does not comply with the form or filing regulations of the commission or that is not consistent with this chapter or the regulations of the commission. A tariff or provision rejected by the commission is void.

In its tariff filed with the commission under (a) of this section, a natural gas pipeline carrier may charge separate rates for firm transportation service and for interruptible transportation service. A natural gas pipeline carrier

may, in addition, impose a reservation fee or similar charge for reservation of capacity in a natural gas pipeline as a condition of providing firm transportation service; the reservation fee or charge imposed by the carrier may not include any variable costs or fixed costs that are not attributable to the provision of firm transportation service;

may not impose a reservation fee or similar charge for reservation of capacity in a natural gas pipeline for interruptible transportation service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 56 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 2003; am § 90 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (b), rewrote the second sentence, which read, “A tariff or provision so rejected is void.”

Sec. 42.06.360.
Adherence to tariffs.

The terms and conditions under which a pipeline carrier offers its services and facilities to the public shall be governed strictly by the provisions of its currently effective tariffs.
A legally filed and effective tariff rate, charge, rule, regulation, or condition of service may not be changed except in the manner provided in this chapter.
If more than one tariff rate or charge can reasonably be applied for billing purposes the one most advantageous to the customer shall be used.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.06.370.
Rates to be just and reasonable.

All rates demanded or received by a pipeline carrier, or by any two or more pipeline carriers jointly, for a service furnished or to be furnished shall be just and reasonable.

Additional regulations governing determination of a reasonable tariff shall be published by the commission.

Rates demanded, observed, charged, or collected by a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier for intrastate service shall be designed as if that portion of the North Slope natural gas pipeline were a public utility regulated under the provisions of AS 42.05.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 56 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.06.380.
Discrimination in rates.

A pipeline carrier may not, as to rates, grant a preference or advantage to any customer or subject a customer to an unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage. A pipeline carrier may not establish or maintain an unreasonable difference as to rates, either as between localities served or between classes of service provided under the certificate.

A pipeline carrier may not directly or indirectly refund, rebate or remit in any manner, or by any device, any portion of the rates and charges or charge, demand or receive a greater or lesser compensation for service than is specified in its effective tariff nor extend to any customer served under the certificate any form of contract, agreement, inducement, privilege or facility, or apply any rule, regulation or condition of service except as are extended or applied to all customers under like circumstances.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.06.390.
Initial or revised rates.

A pipeline carrier may not establish or place in effect any initial rates, charges, rules, regulations, conditions of service or practices except after 90 days’ notice to the commission and to the public. Notice shall be given by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection the tariff provisions which shall plainly indicate the time when the tariff will go into effect. The commission may prescribe additional means of giving notice. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow initial tariffs to take effect on less than 90 days’ notice under conditions the commission prescribes by order.

A pipeline carrier may not establish or place in effect any revised rates, charges, rules, regulations, conditions of service or practices except after 30 days’ notice to the commission and to the public. Notice shall be given by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection the revised tariff provisions which shall plainly indicate the changes to be made in the schedules then in force and the time when the changes will go into effect. The commission may prescribe additional means of giving notice. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes to take effect on less than 30 days’ notice under conditions the commission prescribes by order.

Initial and revised tariffs shall be filed in the manner provided in AS

42.06.350

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 35 SLA 1977)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

Use of in-line price as basis for initial price determination on issuance of certificate of public convenience and necessity under § 7 of Natural Gas Act (15 USCS § 717f), where area rate has been established. 43 ALR Fed. 803.

Sec. 42.06.400.
Suspension of tariff filing.

When a tariff filing is made containing an initial or revised rate, classification, rule, regulation, practice, or condition of service the commission may, either upon written complaint or upon its own motion, after reasonable notice, conduct a hearing to determine the reasonableness and propriety of the filing. Pending a hearing the commission may, by order stating the reasons for its action, suspend the operation of the tariff filing for an initial period not longer than six months beyond the time when it would otherwise go into effect. If good cause is shown, the commission may suspend the operation of the tariff filing for an additional period not to exceed one year following the end of the initial suspension period. If information on which to base a just and reasonable tariff is lacking or incomplete at the close of the second suspension period, the commission may, during the suspension period and for good cause shown, with or without a hearing, order a further suspension and in such instance shall order the filed rate to be collected, subject to refund of the difference between the filed rate and the final rate, until a final rate can be set. The commission may order the difference between the temporary rate established under this section and the filed rate to be placed in escrow or secured by bond pending establishment of the final rate.

An order suspending a tariff filing may be vacated if, after investigation, the commission finds that it is in all respects proper. Otherwise the commission shall hold a hearing on the suspended filing and issue its order, before the end of the suspension period, granting, denying, or modifying the suspended tariff in whole or in part. If an initial tariff is suspended, the commission shall establish a reasonable temporary tariff. The commission may allow the collection of the filed initial tariff, or it may require collection of the temporary tariff. If the commission allows collection of the filed initial tariff, it shall require the pipeline carrier to place the revenue representing the difference between the filed tariff and the temporary tariff in escrow in a financial institution approved by the commission, and keep accurate accounts of all amounts received, specifying by whom and in whose behalf the amounts are paid. At the end or vacation of the suspension period the amount, if any, owing to the pipeline carrier from the difference between the temporary tariff and the permanent tariff shall be paid to the pipeline carrier. The surplus, if any, shall be refunded to the persons in whose behalf the amounts were paid into escrow. Funds may not be released from escrow without the commission’s prior written consent and instructions to the escrow agent. The commission may allow the pipeline carrier, at the carrier’s expense, to substitute a bond or letter of credit in lieu of the escrow requirement. If the commission requires collection of the temporary tariff, it shall require the shipper to place the revenue representing the difference between the filed initial tariff and the temporary tariff in escrow in a financial institution approved by the commission, and require that accurate accounts similar to those specified above in this section be kept by the carrier and the shipper. The person owing shall pay the person owed to the satisfaction of the commission within 30 days after the commission order allowing or setting a permanent tariff. The amount, if any, by which the permanent tariff exceeds the temporary tariff shall be paid by the shipper to the carrier, or, if the temporary tariff exceeds the permanent tariff, the difference shall be paid by the carrier to the shipper, and in either event such payment shall be made with interest calculated on the balance due at the end of each calendar month at the legal rate, as defined in AS

45.45.010(a)

. The commission may allow the shipper, at the shipper’s expense, to substitute a bond or letter of credit in place of the escrow requirement.

If a proposed increased rate is suspended, the commission shall establish a reasonable temporary tariff. The temporary tariff may be the same as the tariff the carrier is seeking to revise. The commission may allow the collection of the filed proposed increased rate, or it may require collection of the temporary rate. If the commission allows collection of the filed increased rate, it shall require the pipeline carrier to place the revenue representing the difference between the filed proposed increased rate and the temporary rate in escrow in a financial institution approved by the commission, and keep an accurate account of all amounts received, specifying by whom and on whose behalf the amounts are paid. At the end or vacation of the suspension period the amount, if any, owing to the pipeline carrier from the difference between the temporary rate and the permanent rate shall be paid to the pipeline carrier. The surplus, if any, shall be refunded to the persons on whose behalf the amounts were paid into escrow. Funds may not be released from escrow without the commission’s prior written consent and instructions to the escrow agent. The commission may allow the pipeline carrier, at the carrier’s expense, to substitute a bond or letter of credit in place of the escrow requirement. If the commission requires collection of the temporary rate, it shall require the shipper to place the revenue representing the difference between the proposed increased rate and the temporary rate in escrow in a financial institution approved by the commission, and require that accurate accounts similar to those specified above in this subsection be kept by the carrier and the shipper. The person owing shall pay the person owed to the satisfaction of the commission within 30 days after the commission’s order allowing or setting a permanent tariff. The commission may allow the shipper, at the shipper’s expense, to substitute a bond or letter of credit instead of meeting the escrow requirement.

One who initiates a change in existing tariffs bears the burden of proving the reasonableness of the change.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 35 SLA 1977; am §§ 1, 2 ch 22 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1979)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.06.410.
Power of commission to fix rates.

When the commission, after an investigation and hearing, finds that a rate demanded, observed, charged, or collected by a pipeline carrier for a service, subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, or that a classification, rule, regulation, practice, or contract affecting the rate, is unjust, unreasonable, unduly discriminatory or preferential, the commission shall determine a just and reasonable rate, classification, rule, regulation, practice, or contract to be observed or allowed and shall establish it by order.

If an investigation is conducted in multiple phases, the commission may establish a rate at the end of a single phase. The rate established at the end of a single phase is to be considered a final rate under AS

42.06.400

. If the rate established at the conclusion of the proceeding under (a) of this section or after judicial review is less than the rate established after a single phase of an investigation, a shipper is entitled to a refund of the difference between the amounts paid by the shipper and the amounts that would have been paid under the rate established at the conclusion of the proceeding or after judicial review. If the rate established at the conclusion of the proceeding under (a) of this section or after judicial review is more than the rate established after a single phase, a pipeline carrier is entitled to a payment of the difference between the amounts paid to the carrier and the amount that would have been paid under the rate established at the conclusion of the proceeding or after judicial review.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 1981)

Sec. 42.06.420.
Valuation of property of a pipeline carrier.

The commission may, after providing reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard, ascertain and set the fair value of the whole or any part of the property of a pipeline carrier, insofar as it is material to the exercise of the jurisdiction of the commission.
The commission may make revaluations from time to time and ascertain the fair value of all new construction, extensions, and additions to the property of a pipeline carrier.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)